Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 3

Natural Resources Trust Fund

11-14-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Natural Resources Trust Fund Act of 1985.”

Acts 1985, ch. 189, § 1.

11-14-302. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Mineral” means all forms of minerals including, but not limited to, oil, gas, and coal; and

“Trust fund” means the natural resources trust fund created by this part.

Acts 1985, ch. 189, § 2.

11-14-303. Purpose.

The general assembly recognizes the need to protect the endowment represented by the land and minerals owned by the state.

These nonrenewable resources are held by the state in trust for the benefit of future generations.

In recognition of the responsibilities of this stewardship, the general assembly is creating the natural resources trust fund.

The purpose of the trust fund is to ensure that development of state-owned nonrenewable resources will proceed in a manner which is economically sound, and that revenues received from the disposal of those resources will be used for the long-term public interest.

Acts 1985, ch. 189, § 3.

11-14-304. Creation of trust fund.

The state treasurer is authorized and directed to establish the natural resources trust fund, as a restricted account in the state treasury.

Acts 1985, ch. 189, § 4.

11-14-305. Source of revenue.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), the state treasurer shall deposit and hold all revenues from the following sources in the trust fund:

Royalties, lease payments, or other revenues collected under leases or other agreements for the extraction of, or right to extract, any state-owned minerals from the land, and the proceeds from the disposal of state-owned mineral interests in land, including state-owned minerals and mineral interests under navigable streams and other waters;

Proceeds from the sale or other conveyance of state-owned real property, including any interest therein;

Bequests, grants, contributions and appropriations which are designated or authorized for receipt into the trust fund; and

Trust fund investment income, less reasonable expenses for investing the trust fund assets.

The following revenues are excluded from the trust fund:

Proceeds necessary to pay administration and disposal costs;

Rental income from nonmineral interests;

Proceeds from the sale and conveyance of real property made with the purpose of acquiring or constructing improvements on other real property to replace that which was conveyed, as determined by the commissioner of finance and administration at the time of the conveyance;

Proceeds from the disposal of minerals excavated incidental to highway or other construction;

Proceeds which, because of federal laws or regulations, are restricted to uses which prevent their being placed in the trust fund;

Proceeds from the sale and conveyance of property deemed surplus right-of-way by the department of transportation under § 12-2-112(a)(7);

Proceeds from the sale and conveyance of property by a college or university if those funds are controlled by § 49-8-111;

Proceeds from the disposal of timber;

Proceeds from the sale and conveyance of property which is otherwise specified by statute as restricted to some other use;

Proceeds from the sale and conveyance of improved property if the appraised fair market value of the improvements exceeds the appraised fair market value of the land, as determined by the commissioner of finance and administration;

Proceeds from the sale and conveyance of property by the University of Tennessee; and

Proceeds described in subdivision (a)(1), which are generated from lands in Campbell and Scott counties which make up the Royal Blue wildlife management area. These proceeds shall be dedicated for use by the wildlife resources agency to manage and maintain the Royal Blue wildlife management area.

The state treasurer is authorized to deposit, hold, invest and manage in the trust fund, subject to this part, any money received pursuant to any bequest, grant or contribution to the state from any person, firm, association, corporation, estate, trust, or other entity, including the United States or any agency thereof; provided, that the bequest, grant or contribution is designated or authorized to be so held and used. The state treasurer is also authorized to receive any security, as defined in § 47-8-102, or other property, pursuant to any such bequest, grant or contribution, and to hold, sell, invest, reinvest and manage the same in the trust fund, or to sell the same and reinvest the proceeds if it is not a lawful investment under the constitution and laws of this state.

Acts 1985, ch. 189, § 5; 1986, ch. 768, § 1; 1998, ch. 778, § 1.

11-14-306. Investments — Separate account — Protection of fund.

Funds in the natural resources trust fund established by this part shall be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to policy guidelines, established by resolution of the funding board, created by § 9-9-101. The funding board shall establish the policy guidelines for investment of the natural resources trust fund in any manner which is lawful for the investment of state funds.

The state treasurer shall establish a separate natural resources trust fund account and shall annually transfer all interest and other earnings of the trust fund into the account, which shall be available for expenditure pursuant to § 11-14-307. The state treasurer shall withhold from the interest and other income of the trust fund such an amount as is necessary to protect the trust fund from inflation based on an appropriate inflation index to be selected by the state funding board. Funds withheld to protect the trust from inflation pursuant to this subsection (b) shall become a part of the corpus of the trust fund.

Acts 1985, ch. 189, § 6.

11-14-307. Use of the fund.

All revenues deposited to the trust fund pursuant to § 11-14-305, other than investment income, shall constitute the corpus of the trust fund. The corpus of the trust fund shall not be expended for any purpose.

The balance of the yearly interest and earnings of the trust fund shall be separately accounted for but may be appropriated for any of the following public purposes:

The acquisition of lands, waters, or interests in lands and waters;

Development of outdoor recreation facilities to serve the general public;

Other capital projects for the conservation of air, land and water resources;

The acquisition or preservation of historic or archaeological properties which are significant to the cultural history of the state;

Grants or other financial assistance to any county or municipal government for any of the above purposes; provided, that such county or municipal government provides an equal amount for any given project; or

Reimbursement of greenbelt rollback taxes assessed against a county or municipal government as the result of acquisition of land for a park; provided, however, that if the land is not used as a park for ten (10) years or more, the county or municipality shall repay the amount of the reimbursement to the fund.

Any unencumbered and unexpended balance of such interest and earnings remaining at the end of any fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall be carried forward until expended. All grants or other financial assistance to county or municipal governments shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner of environment and conservation.

The state treasurer may deduct reasonable service charges from the interest and earnings of the trust fund pursuant to procedures established by the state treasurer and the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1985, ch. 189, § 7; 1992, ch. 687, § 1; 2012, ch. 959, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (d), concerning appropriations for the Tennessee Flora project for fiscal years 1992-1993 through 1995-1996, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2012.

11-14-308. Reviewing and evaluating projects for possible funding — Development of procedures.

The commissioner of environment and conservation, in consultation with the commissioner of finance and administration, shall develop procedures for the purpose of reviewing and evaluating projects for possible funding, pursuant to § 11-14-307(b)(1) of the natural resources trust fund.

Prior to implementing the procedures, the commissioner of environment and conservation shall forward the procedures to the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives and the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate for review and comment.

Any projects recommended for funding shall be considered through the department of environment and conservation's annual budget request.

Such projects for consideration shall include grants to the municipal recreation systems organized pursuant to chapter 24 of this title, programs from county conservation boards organized pursuant to chapter 21 of this title, and joint parks and recreation systems organized pursuant to such chapters or organized pursuant to title 12, chapter 9.

Acts 1990, ch. 686, § 1; 1998, ch. 605, § 3; 2012, ch. 604, § 15; 2013, ch. 236, § 6.